Vermont, session 2025-2026, S23.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. chapter 35, subchapter 4 is added to read:
Subchapter 4. Use of Synthetic Media in Elections
§ 2031. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media” means synthetic media
that appears to a reasonable person to be a realistic representation of:
(A) a political candidate that injures the reputation of a political
candidate; or
(B) an individual that attempts to unduly influence the outcome of an
election, including a public question, by providing materially false information
to voters.
(2) “Synthetic media” means an image, an audio recording, or a video
recording of an individual’s appearance, speech, or conduct that has been
created or intentionally manipulated with the use of digital technology,
including artificial intelligence.
§ 2032. DISCLOSURE OF DECEPTIVE AND FRAUDULENT
SYNTHETIC MEDIA
(a) Disclosure. A person shall not, within 90 days before an election in
Vermont, publish, communicate, or otherwise distribute synthetic media that
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 2 of 8
2026
the person knows is deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media unless the person
includes a disclosure in the synthetic media stating: “This media has been
manipulated or generated by digital technology and depicts speech or conduct
that did not occur.”
(1) For deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media consisting of images
and video recordings, the text of the disclosure shall appear in a size that is
easily readable by the average viewer and inclusive to the greatest extent
possible of individuals with disabilities. For video recordings, the disclosure
shall appear for the full duration of the video recording.
(2) For deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media consisting of audio
recordings only, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in
a pitch and pace that can be easily heard by the average listener and inclusive
to the greatest extent possible of individuals with disabilities, at the beginning
of the audio recording, at the end of the audio recording, and, if the audio is
greater than two minutes in length, interspersed within the audio recording at
intervals of not greater than two minutes each.
(b) Exceptions. Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) a radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or
satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, or to a website,
streaming platform, or mobile application, that:
(A) broadcasts deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media as part of a
bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, commentary of
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 3 of 8
2026
general interest, or on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, provided
the broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a disclosure, in a
manner that can be easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, that
there are questions about the authenticity of the deceptive and fraudulent
synthetic media;
(B) is paid to broadcast deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media; or
(C) is required by federal law to broadcast advertisements from
legally qualified candidates;
(2) a website or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other
periodical of general circulation, including an internet or electronic
publication, that routinely carries news and commentary of general interest,
and that publishes deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media, if the publication
clearly states that the deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media does not
accurately represent the speech or conduct of the represented individual;
(3) a person that produces or distributes deceptive and fraudulent
synthetic media constituting satire or parody;
(4) a provider of a telecommunications service or information service, as
those terms are defined in the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. § 153,
for content provided by another person; or
(5) a provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in 47
U.S.C. § 230, for content provided by another person.
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 4 of 8
2026
§ 2033. PENALTIES
(a) A person that knowingly and intentionally violates a provision of this
subchapter shall be fined not more than $1,000.00, unless:
(1) the person commits the violation with the intent to cause violence or
bodily harm, in which case the fine shall be not more than $5,000.00;
(2) the person commits the violation within five years after one or more
prior violations under this section, in which case the fine shall be not more than
$10,000.00; or
(3) the person commits the violation with the intent to cause violence or
bodily harm and the person commits the violation within five years after one or
more prior violations under this section, in which case the fine shall be not
more than $15,000.00.
(b) A candidate whose appearance, speech, conduct, or environment is
misrepresented through the use of deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media in
violation of section 2032 of this title may seek injunctive or other equitable
relief prohibiting the publication, communication, or other distribution of such
deceptive and fraudulent synthetic media.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. chapter 35, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. Enforcement and Investigation
§ 2041. ENFORCEMENT
In addition to the other remedies provided in this chapter, a State’s Attorney
or the Attorney General may institute any appropriate action, injunction, or
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 5 of 8
2026
other proceeding to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of this
chapter.
§ 2042. CIVIL INVESTIGATIONS
(a)(1) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, whenever there is reason
to believe any person to be or to have been in violation of this chapter, may
examine or cause to be examined by any designated agent or representative
any books, records, papers, memoranda, or physical objects of any nature
bearing upon each alleged violation and may demand written responses under
oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation.
(2) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may require the
attendance of such person or of any other person having knowledge in the
premises in the county where such person resides or has a place of business or
in Washington County if such person is a nonresident or has no place of
business within the State and may take testimony and require proof material
for that person’s information and may administer oaths or take
acknowledgment in respect of any book, record, paper, or memorandum.
(3) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney shall serve notice of the
time, place, and cause of such examination or attendance or notice of the cause
of the demand for written responses personally or by certified mail upon such
person at that person’s principal place of business or, if such place is not
known, to that person’s known address. Such notice shall include a statement
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 6 of 8
2026
that a knowing and intentional violation of this chapter is subject to criminal
prosecution.
(4) Any book, record, paper, memorandum, or other information
produced by any person pursuant to this section shall not, unless otherwise
ordered by a court of this State for good cause shown, be disclosed to any
person other than the authorized agent or representative of the Attorney
General or a State’s Attorney or another law enforcement officer engaged in
legitimate law enforcement activities unless with the consent of the person
producing the same, except that any transcript of oral testimony, written
responses, documents, or other information produced pursuant to this section
may be used in the enforcement of this chapter, including in connection with
any civil action brought under this subchapter or subsection (c) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this subsection is intended to prevent the Attorney
General or a State’s Attorney from disclosing the results of an investigation
conducted under this section, including the grounds for the decision as to
whether to bring an enforcement action alleging a violation of this chapter or
of any rule made pursuant to this chapter.
(6) This subsection shall not be applicable to any criminal investigation
or prosecution brought under the laws of this or any state.
(b)(1) A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall comply with its terms unless otherwise provided by the order
of a court of this State.
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 7 of 8
2026
(2) Any person that, with intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance,
in whole or in part, with any civil investigation under this section, removes
from any place; conceals, withholds, or destroys; or mutilates, alters, or by any
other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, or
control of any person subject to such notice or mistakes or conceals any
information shall be fined not more than $5,000.00.
(c)(1) Whenever any person fails to comply with any notice served upon
that person under this section or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction
of any such material cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the
material, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may file, in the Superior
Court in the county in which the person resides or of that person’s principal
place of business or in Washington County if the person is a nonresident or has
no principal place of business in this State, and serve upon the person a petition
for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section.
(2) Whenever any petition is filed under this section, the court shall have
jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented and to enter any
order or orders as may be required to carry into effect the provisions of this
section. Any disobedience of any order entered under this section by any court
shall be punished as a contempt of the court.
(d) Any person aggrieved by a civil investigation conducted under this
section may seek relief from Washington Superior Court or the Superior Court
in the county in which the aggrieved person resides. Except for cases the court
VT LEG #387741 v.1

No. 75 Page 8 of 8
2026
considers to be of greater importance, proceedings before Superior Court as
authorized by this section shall take precedence on the docket over all other
cases.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: March 5, 2026
VT LEG #387741 v.1